Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 650.12 of Title 21, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Every person who, without justifiable or excusable cause and


with intent to do bodily harm, commits any assault, battery, or


assault and battery upon a security officer, private investigator,


or bail enforcer is, upon conviction, guilty of a misdemeanor


punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one (1)


year, or by a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),


or by both such fine and imprisonment.


B. As used in this section:



Req. No. 10552 Page 1


1. "Security officer" means any person who is currently


licensed by the State of Oklahoma as either an armed or unarmed


security officer, or is lawfully employed as a security officer but


exempt from the licensing requirements provided for in state


statute, who is wearing a uniform that clearly identifies the


individual as a security officer with at least one emblem or


insignia that identifies the employing security firm or agency or if


the individual is in plain clothes, is wearing a distinctive badge


that identifies the employing security firm or agency, and is


engaged in the lawful performance of his or her duties at the time


the incident occurred;


2. "Private investigator" means any person who is currently


licensed by the State of Oklahoma as either an armed or unarmed


private investigator who is either wearing distinctive clothing that


has a distinctive emblem, logo or badge that identifies the


employing firm or agency or when the private investigator identifies


himself or herself or provides proof of employment as a private


investigator, and is engaged in the lawful performance of his or her


duties at the time the incident occurred; and


3. "Bail enforcer" means any person who is currently licensed


by the state of Oklahoma as either an armed or unarmed bail enforcer


and is ether wearing distinctive clothing that has a distinctive


emblem, logo or badge that identifies the bail enforcer as such and



Req. No. 10552 Page 2


is be engaged in the lawful performance of his or her duties at the


time the incident occurred.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-10552 GRS 12/18/24







































Req. No. 10552 Page 3